Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE D. STATE PURCHASING AND GENERAL SERVICES

CHAPTER 2172. MISCELLANEOUS GENERAL SERVICES PROVIDED BY COMPTROLLER

Sec. 2172.001. CENTRAL SUPPLY STORE. The comptroller may operate a central supply store at which only state agencies, the legislature, and legislative agencies may obtain small supply items. If the comptroller operates a central supply store, the comptroller shall devise an appropriate method of billing a using entity for the supplies.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 309, Sec. 10.01, 10.03, eff. June 18, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 108, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2172.0011. COMPTROLLER POWERS AND DUTIES. The comptroller has under this chapter the powers and duties described by Section 2151.004(d).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.37, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 108, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2172.0012. AUTHORITY TO ADOPT RULES. The comptroller may adopt rules to efficiently and effectively administer this chapter. Before adopting a rule under this section, the comptroller must conduct a public hearing regarding the proposed rule regardless of whether the requirements of Section 2001.029(b) are met.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.37, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 2172.002. BUSINESS MACHINE REPAIR. (a) The comptroller may maintain a facility for repairing office machines and may offer repair services to the following entities located in Austin:

(1) state agencies;

(2) the legislature; and

(3) legislative agencies.

(b) Using entities shall pay the comptroller for repair services by vouchers prepared and sent to the using entity by the comptroller.

(c) The comptroller may not repair or maintain a privately owned machine.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 309, Sec. 10.02, eff. June 18, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 108, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2172.003. PRINTING. (a) The comptroller may:

(1) assist a state agency with the agency's printing activities; and

(2) assess and evaluate those activities.

(b) The comptroller may recommend changes intended to increase the productivity and cost-effectiveness of printing operations of state agencies. Recommendations may be reported periodically as provided by comptroller rules.

(c) The comptroller may:

(1) adopt standard accounting procedures that permit evaluating and comparing the costs of printing operations conducted by state agencies;

(2) coordinate activities among state print shops;

(3) review state agency requisitions for new printing shop equipment;

(4) assist state agencies in expediting the production of printing and graphic arts;

(5) maintain a roster of state print shops and their equipment, facilities, and special capabilities;

(6) serve as a clearinghouse for private vendors of printing services to ensure that printing services and supplies are purchased in the most efficient and economical manner;

(7) coordinate the consolidation of print shops operated by state agencies when the agencies involved determine that consolidation is appropriate; and

(8) develop procedures for the recovery of the comptroller's reasonable costs under Chapter 317 from amounts appropriated to the state agencies for which identified savings are achieved.

(d) This section does not apply to an institution of higher education.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 109, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2172.004. ARCHIVES. The comptroller may store and display the archives of Texas.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 110, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2172.005. DONATIONS. The comptroller may solicit and accept private donations for the Congress Avenue beautification program, a capital improvements project in Austin. The program includes improvements in the Capitol Complex generally north of the Capitol along either side of Congress Avenue.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 41, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 110, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2172.006. MANUFACTURE AND SALE OF CERTAIN COMMEMORATIVE ITEMS. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the comptroller may negotiate and contract with a privately owned business entity for the design and manufacture of:

(1) an official state lapel pin for purchase by members and former members of the house of representatives;

(2) an official state lapel pin for purchase by members and former members of the senate;

(3) an official state ring for purchase by members and former members of the house of representatives; and

(4) an official state ring for purchase by members and former members of the senate.

(b) The comptroller must submit any design of an official state lapel pin or ring to the State Preservation Board for its approval.

(c) Only a member or former member of the legislature may purchase an official state lapel pin or ring manufactured under this section. The member or former member must use the member's or former member's personal funds for the purchase.

(d) The comptroller by rule shall establish the purchase price for a lapel pin or ring. After payment of amounts required under the contract and recovery of its costs of administering this section, the comptroller shall deposit any remaining funds received from the sale of items under this section to the credit of the Texas preservation trust fund.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 69, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1071 (H.B. 1524), Sec. 111, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2172.007. SHIPPING LOGISTICS AND COORDINATION SERVICES. (a) The comptroller may contract with a vendor to oversee shipping logistics and coordination services for all state agencies and shall pay the contract from the anticipated cost savings realized under the contract. The vendor shall arrange the shipment of goods, parcels, and freight using the shipping company selected by the state agency through competitive bidding that provides the best value to the agency for the shipment.

(b) A state agency may arrange all shipments of goods, parcels, and freight under this section.

(c) The vendor under this section shall maintain a record of each shipment arranged for a state agency, including the cost of the shipment, the type of goods, parcels, or freight shipped, and the weight of the goods, parcels, or freight shipped.

(d) In contracting for the oversight of shipping logistics and coordination services under this section, the comptroller may provide contracting opportunities for vendors that employ veterans or other persons with disabilities whose products and services are available under Chapter 122, Human Resources Code.

(e) This section does not apply to the shipment of:

(1) items of extraordinary value;

(2) museum exhibits and antiquities;

(3) antique furniture;

(4) fine arts;

(5) specialized materials or products;

(6) coins and paper bills; or

(7) items by the Texas Department of Transportation if the department determines that, because of the nature of the items or the circumstances related to the shipment, shipment of the items under a procedure established by the department is necessary.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 945 (H.B. 1726), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.